Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1415HV (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. 396 Section 1. Section 9.11, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. Chapter 524, including as provided in 3 section 524.303. 4 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 524.2002 Secretary of state ââ extra 5 services ââ surcharge. 6 Upon the request of a filer of a document under this chapter, 7 the secretary of state shall provide an extra filing service 8 and assess a surcharge as provided in chapter 9, subchapter II. 9